Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Article 1. Miscellaneous Offenses

§ 13-10-101.
General penalty.

Any officer, director, owner or employee of a financial institution who willfully and knowingly violates any provision of this act for which a penalty is not expressly provided is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, or both.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 111; R.S. 1931, § 10-603; C.S. 1945, § 35-601; W.S. 1957, § 13-196; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 2003, ch. 16, § 1.

Cross references. —

For civil liability of bank directors, see §

13-2-404

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 13-1-101(a)(xiv).

§ 13-10-102.
False statements.

Any owner, director, officer or employee of a financial institution who makes any false entry or fails to make new entries of matters pertaining to the affairs of the financial institution in the books or statements of the financial institution with intent to injure or defraud the financial institution or deceive any officer of the financial institution or any person appointed to examine the affairs of the financial institution is guilty of a felony punishable by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), imprisonment for not less than one (1) year nor more than ten (10) years, or both.

Any officer, director, owner or employee of a financial institution who willfully and knowingly subscribes, makes or causes to be made any false statement or report to the state banking commissioner, or subscribes or exhibits false papers with intent to deceive any person authorized to examine the affairs of the financial institution, or states or publishes any false report or statement of the financial institution is guilty of a felony punishable by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), imprisonment for not less than one (1) year nor more than ten (10) years, or both.

Any person who willfully and knowingly makes, circulates or transmits any false statement or rumor to another which is directly or indirectly derogatory to the financial condition or affects the solvency or financial standing of a financial institution doing business in Wyoming is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 36, § 5; ch. 88, § 21; R.S. 1899, §§ 5003, 5004; C.S. 1910, §§ 5847, 5848; C.S. 1920, §§ 7136, 7137; Laws 1925, ch. 155, § 15; ch. 157, §§ 117, 119; R.S. 1931, §§ 10-609, 10-611, 32-344, 32-345, 109-515; C.S. 1945, §§ 9-1101, 9-1102, 18-815, 35-607, 35-609; W.S. 1957, §§ 13-197 to 13-199, 13-207, 13-209; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1992, ch. 46, § 1; 2003, ch. 16, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to perjury, see §

6-5-301

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Bank's liability to real-property purchaser for misrepresentation respecting purchaser's obtaining government guaranteed or subsidized loan, 37 ALR4th 773.

Liability of bank or safe-deposit company for its employee's theft or misappropriation of contents of safe-deposit box, 39 ALR4th 543.

§ 13-10-103.
Fraudulent insolvency.

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 162, § 2.

Any officer or director of a financial institution who participates in a fraudulent insolvency of a financial institution is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), imprisonment for not less than one (1) month nor more than one (1) year, or both.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 36, §§ 6, 7; R.S. 1899, § 5005; C.S. 1910, § 5849; C.S. 1920, § 7138; Laws 1925, ch. 157, §§ 83, 118; R.S. 1931, §§ 10-504, 10-610, 32-346; C.S. 1945, §§ 9-1103, 9-1104, 35-504, 35-608; W.S. 1957, §§ 13-130, 13-200, 13-201, 13-208; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1985, ch. 162, § 2; 2003, ch. 16, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

When is national bank's transaction “in contemplation” of insolvency, so as to be void under 12 USC § 91, 109 ALR Fed 247.

§ 13-10-104.
Wrongful certification, issuance or delivery of instruments, preferences or borrowing.

Any owner, director, officer, agent or employee of a financial institution who willfully certifies a check on the account of the drawer of the check which does not contain sufficient funds to pay the check is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000.00).

Any owner, director, officer or employee of a financial institution who issues or delivers any certificate of deposit, draws any check, draft or bill of exchange, makes any acceptance, or signs any note, bond, draft, bill of exchange, mortgage, judgment or decree without the approval of the board of directors is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not less than one (1) year nor more than twenty (20) years.

Any officer, director or employee of a bank who violates the provisions of W.S.

13-3-103

or

13-3-203

is guilty of a felony punishable by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), imprisonment for not less than one (1) year nor more than five (5) years, or both.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 36, §§ 6, 7; R.S. 1899, § 5005; C.S. 1910, § 5849; C.S. 1920, § 7138; Laws 1925, ch. 157, §§ 83, 118; R.S. 1931, §§ 10-504, 10-610, 32-346; C.S. 1945, §§ 9-1103, 9-1104, 35-504, 35-608; W.S. 1957, §§ 13-32, 13-198, 13-203, 13-205; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 2003, ch. 16, § 1.

Information not defective. —

Information charging that defendants were directors of bank and that they willfully misapplied funds thereof, with intent to defraud it, held not defective in failing to state that misapplication was made by defendants in their official capacity. State v. Grandbouche, 32 Wyo. 88, 230 P. 338,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 32 Wyo. 88, 233 P. 532,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Wyo. 1924).

§ 13-10-105.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 5.

Cross references. —

As to larceny and related offenses, see §

6-3-401

et seq.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from C.L. 1876, ch. 35, §§ 149 and 150, related to false stock transactions.

§ 13-10-106.
Transactions exceeding liability limits; concealing or failing to report transactions.

Any officer, director or agent of a financial institution who makes or delivers any guarantee or endorsement on behalf of the financial institution whereby the financial institution may become liable upon any of the financial institution’s discounted notes, bills or obligations in an amount exceeding the amount of loans or discounts which the financial institution may make under this act is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500.00) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), imprisonment for not less than one (1) month nor more than one (1) year, or both.

Any director of a financial institution who concurs in any vote or act of the board of directors or any director of the financial institution whereby it is intended to make a loan or discount to a director of the financial institution or upon an instrument on which a director is liable, exceeding the amount allowed under this act, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500.00) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), imprisonment for not less than one (1) month nor more than one (1) year, or both.

Any officer, director or employee of a financial institution who intentionally conceals any discounts or loans, purchases of securities or sale of financial institution securities by the financial institution from the officers or directors of the financial institution, or who knowingly fails to report all discounts, loans or purchases of securities by the financial institution to the board of directors when required to do so by law, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500.00) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), imprisonment for not less than one (1) month nor more than one (1) year, or both.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 116; R.S. 1931, § 10-608; C.S. 1945, § 35-606; W.S. 1957, § 13-206; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 2003, ch. 16, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to permissible loans to bank officers and directors, see §

13-3-102

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsections (a) and (b), see § 13-1-101(a)(xiv).

§ 13-10-107.
Failure to report or cooperate with state banking commissioner.

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 64, § 2.

Any bank failing to submit reports to the state banking commissioner as required by W.S. 13-3-701(d) is subject to a civil penalty of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per day for each day the reports are delayed. Any trust company failing to submit reports to the commissioner as required by W.S. 13-5-110(a)(i) is subject to a civil penalty of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per day for each day the reports are delayed.

Any officer, director or employee of a financial institution or bank holding company who willfully and knowingly fails to report any transfer of ownership interests of the financial institution or a bank holding company to the commissioner as required by this act is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), imprisonment for not less than six (6) months nor more than one (1) year, or both.

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 42, § 3.

Any person refusing or obstructing access to the state banking commissioner to any books, records or papers, refusing to furnish any required information, or hindering a full examination of the books, accounts, papers and finances of a financial institution is guilty of a felony punishable by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), imprisonment for a period of not less than one (1) year, or both.

A financial institution shall keep books and accounts in a convenient manner so as to enable the examiner to readily ascertain the true condition of the financial institution. Any financial institution that refuses or neglects to open and keep books and accounts as prescribed by the state banking commissioner is subject to a penalty of three hundred dollars ($300.00) per day for each day the financial institution neglects or fails to open and keep the books and accounts after receiving written notice from the state banking commissioner.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 155, § 13; ch. 157, §§ 29, 42, 112; R.S. 1931, §§ 10-129, 10-144, 10-604, 109-513; C.S. 1945, §§ 18-813, 35-130, 35-147, 35-602; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-100, 13-17, 13-19, 13-202; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1985, ch. 162, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1992, ch. 46, § 1; 1998, ch. 64, §§ 1, 2; 1999, ch. 42, § 3; 2001, ch. 73, § 1; 2003, ch. 16, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (c), see § 13-1-101(a)(xiv).

§ 13-10-108.
Operating bank or savings and loan association or trust company without complying with provisions.

Any person, firm or corporation excluding national banks which conducts a banking business or which advertises, issues, circulates or exhibits any card, paper or sign using the term “bank”, “banker”, “banking” or words of similar import without compliance with this act and following ten (10) days notice given by the state banking commissioner, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both.

Any person doing business or soliciting or attempting to do business in Wyoming for any savings and loan association not chartered by the federal government which has not complied with the provisions of this act is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), imprisonment for not more than thirty (30) days, or both.

Any person, firm or corporation which conducts a trust business without compliance with this act and following ten (10) days notice given by the commissioner, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 12; R.S. 1931, § 10-112; C.S. 1945, § 35-113; W.S. 1957, § 13-11; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1993, ch. 115, § 1; 2003, ch. 16, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 13-1-101(a)(xiv).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Maintenance of computer terminal in retail store for purpose of effecting transfer of funds between financial institution and its depositors as conduct of banking business by store, 73 ALR3d 1282.

§ 13-10-109.
Refusal to exhibit stock ledger or register.

Any officer of a financial institution refusing to exhibit the stock ledger or register of the financial institution to any person entitled to inspect the ledger or register is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed fifty dollars ($50.00).

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 15; R.S. 1931, § 10-115; C.S. 1945, § 35-116; W.S. 1957, § 13-62; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 2003, ch. 16, § 1.

§ 13-10-110.
Improper procurement of loans; permitting accounts to be overdrawn.

Any officer, director, agent or employee of a financial institution who asks for, receives or agrees to receive any compensation, reward or personal advantage for procuring or endeavoring to procure for any person, firm or corporation any loan from or the purchase or discount of any instrument by the financial institution, or for permitting any person, firm or corporation to overdraw any account with the financial institution, is guilty of a felony punishable by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), imprisonment for not less than one (1) year nor more than ten (10) years, or both.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 114; R.S. 1931, § 10-606; C.S. 1945, § 35-604; W.S. 1957, § 13-204; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 2003, ch. 16, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes violation of provisions of Bank Holding Company Act prohibiting tying arrangements (12 USC § 1972(1)), 74 ALR Fed 578.

§ 13-10-111.
Financial involvement by state banking commissioner and employees.

The state banking commissioner and employees of the state banking commissioner’s office shall not become indebted to any financial institution under state supervision nor shall engage or be interested in the sale of securities or negotiation of loans for others with any financial institution under state supervision. Violation of this section constitutes grounds for removal from office.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 45a; R.S. 1931, § 10-136; C.S. 1945, § 35-139; W.S. 1957, § 13-27; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 2003, ch. 16, § 1.

§ 13-10-112.
Prosecution of criminal violations.

The district attorney for the county where a criminal violation of this act occurs shall prosecute the case upon complaint of the commissioner.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 42, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 13-1-101(a)(xiv).